Utah statutes.
53B-18-202.   Cooperative contracts for expenses.

The university may enter into cooperative contracts with the United States Department of Agriculture, county or city officers, private and public organizations, corporations, and individuals, to share the expense of establishing and maintaining an agricultural extension service.  The county legislative body of each county may provide sufficient funds to insure that the agricultural extension service functions properly in its county.

